Utah statutes.
17D-1-201.   Services that a special service district may be created to provide.

As provided in this part, a county or municipality may create a special service district to provide any combination of the following services:

(1)  water;

(2)  sewerage;

(3)  drainage;

(4)  flood control;

(5)  garbage collection and disposal;

(6)  health care;

(7)  transportation, including the receipt of federal secure rural school funds under Section 51-9-603 for the purposes of constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining public roads;

(8)  recreation;

(9)  fire protection, including:

(a)  emergency medical services, ambulance services, and search and rescue services, if fire protection service is also provided;

(b)  Firewise Communities programs and the development of community wildfire protection plans; and

(c)  the receipt of federal secure rural school funds as provided under Section 51-9-603 for the purposes of carrying out Firewise Communities programs, developing community wildfire protection plans, and performing emergency services, including firefighting on federal land and other services authorized under this Subsection (9);

(10)  providing, operating, and maintaining correctional and rehabilitative facilities and programs for municipal, state, and other detainees and prisoners;

(11)  street lighting;

(12)  consolidated 911 and emergency dispatch;

(13)  animal shelter and control;

(14)  receiving federal mineral lease funds under Title 59, Chapter 21, Mineral Lease Funds, and expending those funds to provide construction and maintenance of public facilities, traditional governmental services, and planning, as a means for mitigating impacts from extractive mineral industries; and

(15)  in a county of the first class, extended police protection.

